Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1900.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 890 of Title 62, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Any business entity that receives direct funding from this


state, including by grants or direct payment but not including an


entity that is compensated by this state for providing goods or


services, or that receives incentives pursuant to the acts and


provisions provided in subsection B of this section, shall provide

Req. No. 2582 Page 1


an amount equal to five percent (5%) of the value of the incentives


or funds to the political subdivision in which the project or


entity, for which the funds are received, is located.


B. The incentives received pursuant to the following acts and


provisions shall require a payment pursuant to subsection A of this


section:


1. Oklahoma Local Development and Enterprise Zone Incentive


Leverage Act, Section 840 et seq. of Title 62 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


2. Local Development Act, Section 850 et seq. of Title 62 of


the Oklahoma Statutes;


3. Tax credit for investments, Section 2357.4 of Title 68 of


the Oklahoma Statutes;


4. Oklahoma Quality Jobs Program Act, Section 3601 et seq. of


Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


5. Filmed in Oklahoma Act of 2021, Section 3631 et seq. of


Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


6. Reindustrialize Oklahoma Act of 2025, Section 3647.1 et seq.


of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


7. 21st Century Quality Jobs Incentive Act, Section 3911 et


seq. of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


8. Oklahoma Rural Jobs Act, Section 3930 et seq. of Title 68 of


the Oklahoma Statutes;



Req. No. 2582 Page 2


9. Oklahoma Five Major Sports Leagues Rebate Program Act,


Section 3951 et seq. of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes; and


10. Oklahoma Quality Investment Act, Section 4201 et seq. of


Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


C. The payment required pursuant to subsection A of this


section shall be allocated as follows:


1. If the entity or project for which the incentives or funds


are received is located in a town or municipality, the payment shall


go to such town or municipality;


2. Except as provided for in paragraph 3 of this subsection, if


the entity or project for which the incentives or funds are received


is located outside of any town or municipality, the payment shall go


to the county in which such entity or project is located; and


3. If the entity or project for which the incentives or funds


are received is located outside of any town or municipality, but the


entity or project utilizes the infrastructure of a town or


municipality, including, but not limited to, utilities, roads, or


facilities, seventy-five percent (75%) of the payment shall go to


such town or municipality, and twenty-five percent (25%) of the


payment shall go to the county in which such entity or project is


located.


D. Payments received by towns, municipalities, and counties


pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be expended


exclusively on infrastructure.

Req. No. 2582 Page 3


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2582 QD 1/15/2026 8:37:45 AM











































Req. No. 2582 Page 4